test/src/gt-norm-yamls/N-sualui_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
#  xerox:
#    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
#    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
#    App: lookup

Tests:



  Noun - suálui: # contracted
    suálui+N+Sg+Nom: [suálui, suáloi]
    suálui+N+Sg+Gen: suolluu
    suálui+N+Sg+Acc: suolluu
    suálui+N+Sg+Ill: suollui
    suálui+N+Sg+Loc: suollust
    suálui+N+Sg+Com: suolluin
    suálui+N+Sg+Abe: suolluuttáá
    suálui+N+Ess: [suálujin, suálojin]
    suálui+N+Par: [suálujin, suálojin]
    suálui+N+Pl+Nom: suolluuh
    suálui+N+Pl+Gen: suollui
    suálui+N+Pl+Acc: suolluid
    suálui+N+Pl+Ill: suolluid
    suálui+N+Pl+Loc: suolluin
    suálui+N+Pl+Com: suolluiguin
    suálui+N+Pl+Abe: suolluittáá
